Maryland, session 2025, HB0289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
SUBTITLE 9. INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
3–901.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” MEANS THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
3–902.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0289*

HOUSE BILL 289
(A) THERE IS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM IS AN INDEPENDENT PROGRAM THAT
IS SEPARATE FROM MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL ENTERPRISES UNDER SUBTITLE 5
OF THIS TITLE.
3–903.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM TO
PROVIDE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS THE OPPORTUNITY TO SERVE AS A PAID
APPRENTICE IN AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR WITH
A PRIVATE ENTITY.
(B) THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM SHALL PRIORITIZE EMPLOYMENT IN
SKILLED TRADES WITH THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS
TO DEVELOP MARKETABLE JOB SKILLS AND TO PROVIDE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO EARN MONEY THAT CAN BE USED ONCE
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS RELEASED FROM INCARCERATION.
(C) EMPLOYERS PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM MAY
INCLUDE AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND PRIVATE
ENTITIES.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE ASSIGNMENTS FOR
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS TO ELIGIBLE EMPLOYERS WHO ARE
PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(2) AN EMPLOYER MAY REJECT THE DEPARTMENT’S PROPOSED
ASSIGNMENT OR CEASE PARTICIPATION IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM AT ANY
TIME.
3–904.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER WHO IS
A PARTICIPANT IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM SHALL DETERMINE THE WAGE
PAID TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(B) A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL PAY A COMPENSATION RATE OF NOT LESS THAN THE STATE
MINIMUM WAGE UNDER § 3–413(C) OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(C) AN EMPLOYER WHO IS AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM PARTICIPANT

HOUSE BILL 289 3
SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE AMOUNT AGREED ON WITH THE
DEPARTMENT, AS PART OF THE AGREEMENT FOR THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM,
FOR EACH DAY THAT AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS EMPLOYED AS PART OF THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FROM THE PAYMENTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CREDIT THE AMOUNT HELD TO THE ACCOUNT OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER § 3–609 OF THIS TITLE, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT THE SPOUSE, CHILD, OR OTHER
DEPENDENT OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL NEEDS FINANCIAL SUPPORT, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY PAY ALL OR PART OF THE PAYMENTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION, AS THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS PROPER, TO THE SPOUSE,
CHILD, OR DEPENDENT.
3–905.
(A) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL PROVIDE, OR MAKE
ARRANGEMENTS THAT IT CONSIDERS TO BE ADEQUATE AND PROPER TO PROVIDE,
FOR THE GUARDING, TRANSPORTING, LODGING, FEEDING, CLOTHING, AND MEDICAL
AND OTHER CARE OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHILE THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(B) (1) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ASSIGNED TO AN AGENCY OR
A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT AS A PARTICIPANT IN THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM, THE STATE SHALL PAY THE EXPENSES INCURRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ASSIGNED TO A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION, COUNTY, OR PRIVATE ENTITY AS A PARTICIPANT IN THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM, THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, COUNTY, OR PRIVATE
ENTITY SHALL PAY THE EXPENSES INCURRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION UNDER ARRANGEMENTS MADE WITH OR SATISFACTORY TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
3–906.
AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM IS ENTITLED TO THE SAME DEDUCTIONS OR ALLOWANCES FOR GOOD
BEHAVIOR, OBSERVANCE OF DISCIPLINE AND RULES, AND DILIGENT AND FAITHFUL
LABOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME FORFEITURES OR PUNISHMENTS FOR BAD

HOUSE BILL 289
BEHAVIOR AND OTHER VIOLATIONS THAT OTHERWISE APPLY TO INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE.
3–907.
IF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SCHEDULED RELEASE OF
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WITH A CERTIFICATE DEMONSTRATING THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM.
3–908.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.